src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VR_MAINITA !!≈ * **@CODE@** mainitakseh:maini
!Verbs of the Finnish type 5
:%{back%}čče VR-LONGSTEM_ ;
:%{back%} VR-SHORTSTEM_ ;



LEXICON VR_
	VR-LONGSTEM_ ;
	VR-SHORTSTEM_ ;
LEXICON VR-LONGSTEM_
+Rfl+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%^WGStem%>mm%{oö%}s	K	;
+Rfl+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%^WGStem%>tt%{oö%}s	K	;
+Rfl+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^WGStem%>h	K	;
+Rfl+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%^WGStem%>mm%{oö%}kseh	K	;
+Rfl+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%^WGStem%>tt%{oö%}kseh	K	;

+Rfl+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>mm%{oö%}s	K	;
+Rfl+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>tt%{oö%}s	K	;
+Rfl+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>h	K	;
+Rfl+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>mm%{oö%}kseh	K	;
+Rfl+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>tt%{oö%}kseh	K	;

LEXICON VR-SHORTSTEM_
+Rfl+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^WGStem%>j%{aä%}h	K	;
+Rfl+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Sg:%^WGStem%>	K	;
+Rfl+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl1:%^WGStem%>	K	;
+Rfl+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl2:%^WGStem%>	K	;
+Rfl+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3:%^WGStem%>j%{aä%}	K	;
+Rfl+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>ttih	K	;
+Rfl+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:%>%{lnrs%}%{uy%}h	K	;
+Rfl+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl1:%>%{lnrs%}%{uy%}h	K	;
+Rfl+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl2:%>%{lnrs%}%{uy%}h	K	;
+Rfl+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3:%>tt%{uy%}	K	;

+Inf+Rfl:%>j%{aä%}kseh K ; !2021-03-13

!LEXICON VR-SHORTSTEM_BACK
!+Rfl+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^WGStem%>jah	K	;
!+Rfl+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Sg:%^WGStem%>	K	;
!+Rfl+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl1:%^WGStem%>	K	;
!+Rfl+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl2:%^WGStem%>	K	;
!+Rfl+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3:%^WGStem%>ja	K	;
!+Rfl+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>ttih	K	;
!+Rfl+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:%>%{lnrs%}uh	K	;
!+Rfl+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl1:%>%{lnrs%}uh	K	;
!+Rfl+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl2:%>%{lnrs%}uh	K	;
!+Rfl+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3:%>ttu	K	;
!LEXICON VR-SHORTSTEM_FRONT
!+Rfl+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^WGStem%>jäh	K	;
!+Rfl+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Sg:%^WGStem%>	K	;
!+Rfl+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl1:%^WGStem%>	K	;
!+Rfl+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl2:%^WGStem%>	K	;
!+Rfl+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3:%^WGStem%>jä	K	;
!+Rfl+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>ttih	K	;
!+Rfl+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:%>%{lnrs%}yh	K	;
!+Rfl+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl1:%>%{lnrs%}yh	K	;
!+Rfl+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl2:%>%{lnrs%}yh	K	;
!+Rfl+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3:%>tty	K	;


LEXICON V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS
+Act: INDPRTSG1 ;
+Act: INDPRTSG2 ;
+Act: INDPRTPL1 ;
+Act: INDPRTPL2 ;

LEXICON V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG
+Act:%^E2O INDPRSSG3_BACK ;
!+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>%{lnrs%}uh K ;
+Act: INDPRTCONNEG_nuh ;

+Act: CONDPRS_S_BACK  ;
+Act: CONDPRT_nus ;
+Act: CONDPRTPL3_Etannus ;

+Act: POT_N_BACK ;
+Act: POTPL3_Etanneh ;
+Act: IMPRT_kka ;
+Act: IMPRTPL3_Ettahes ;
 PSS-PRSPRC_Ettavu ;
 ACT-PRFPRC_nuH ;
 PSS-PRFPRC_Ettu ;

 M-INF_BACK        ;

 ACT-PRSPRC_OSTAI ;
 GER_jen ;
 GER-TEMP_jes ;

LEXICON V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS
+Act: INDPRTSG3 ;

LEXICON V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK
+Act: INDPRSSG1 ;
+Act: INDPRSSG2 ;
+Act: INDPRSPL1 ;
+Act: INDPRSPL2 ;
+Act: INDPRSPL3_EtAh ;
+Act: INDPRSCONNEG_WEAK ;
+Act: INDPRTPL3_Ettih ;
+Act: INDPRTCONNEGPL3_EttU ;
+Act: CONDPRSPL3_EttAs ;

!LEXICON V-VV_01_FRONT_USUALLY-WEAK
!+Act: INDPRSSG1 ;
!+Act: INDPRSSG2 ;
!+Act: INDPRSPL1_FRONT ;
!+Act: INDPRSPL2_FRONT ;
!+Act: INDPRSPL3_Etäh ;
!+Act: INDPRSCONNEG_WEAK ;
!+Act: INDPRTPL3_Ettih ;
!+Act: INDPRTCONNEGPL3_Etty ;
!+Act: CONDPRSPL3_Ettäs ;

!LEXICON V-VV_01_FRONT_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS
!+Act: INDPRTSG1 ;
!+Act: INDPRTSG2 ;
!+Act: INDPRTPL1_FRONT ;
!+Act: INDPRTPL2_FRONT ;

LEXICON V-VV_01_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG
+Act: INDPRSSG3_FRONT ;
!+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>%{lnrs%}%{uy%}h K ;
+Act: INDPRTCONNEG_nyh ;
+Act: CONDPRS_S_FRONT  ;
+Act: CONDPRT_nys ;
+Act: CONDPRTPL3_Etännys ;
+Act: POT_N_FRONT ;
+Act: POTPL3_Etänneh ;
+Act: IMPRT_kkä ;
+Act: IMPRTPL3_Ettähes ;
 ACT-PRSPRC_PEZII ;
 PSS-PRSPRC_Ettävy ;
 ACT-PRFPRC_nyH ;
 PSS-PRFPRC_Etty ;
 M-INF_FRONT        ;
 GER_jen ;
 GER-TEMP_jes ;
LEXICON V-VV_01_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS
+Act: INDPRTSG3 ;

!LEXICON V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr
!! V1
!! This verb type has two final vowels in the first infinitive
!+Act:%^WGStem V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK ;
!+Act: V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG ;

LEXICON V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK
+Act: INDPRSSG1 ;
+Act: INDPRSSG2 ;
+Act: INDPRSPL1 ;
+Act: INDPRSPL2 ;
+Act: INDPRSPL3_EtAh ;
+Act: INDPRSCONNEG_WEAK ;
+Act: INDPRTPL3_Ettih ;
+Act: INDPRTCONNEGPL3_EttU ;
+Act: CONDPRSPL3_EttAs ;
+Act: IMPRT_kkA ; ! 2024-08-19 move from V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG
: PSS-PRSPRC_ttAvU ;

LEXICON V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS
+Act: INDPRTSG1 ;
+Act: INDPRTSG2 ;
+Act: INDPRTPL1 ;
+Act: INDPRTPL2 ;

LEXICON V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG
+Act: INDPRSSG3 ;
!+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>%{lnrs%}%{uy%}h K ;
+Act: CONDPRS_S  ;
+Act: CONDPRTPL3_EtAnnUs ;
+Act: POTPL3_EtAnneh ;
+Err/Orth+Act: IMPRT_kkA ; ! 2024-08-19 move to V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK
+Act: IMPRTPL3_EttAhes ;
 ACT-PRSPRC_PEZII ;
 PSS-PRSPRC_EttAvU ;
 PSS-PRFPRC_EttU ;
 M-INF      ;
 GER_jen ;
 GER-TEMP_jes ;
+Act: INDPRTCONNEG_nUh ;
+Act: CONDPRT_nUs ;
+Act: POT_N ;
 ACT-PRFPRC_nUH ;


LEXICON V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS
+Act: INDPRTSG3 ;


!LEXICON V-3SYLL_KIRJUTTUA !!≈ **@CODE@**  kirjuttua:kirjutta
!! V1 3-syllable stem 
!! This verb type has two final vowels in the first infinitive
!+Act: INDPRSSG1 ;
!+Act: INDPRSSG2 ;
!+Act: INDPRSSG3 ;
!+Act: INDPRSPL1 ;
!+Act: INDPRSPL2 ;
!+Act: INDPRSPL3_Etah ;
!+Act: INDPRSCONNEG_WEAK ;

!+Act: INDPRTSG1 ;
!+Act: INDPRTSG2 ;
!+Act: INDPRTSG3 ;
!+Act: INDPRTPL1 ;
!+Act: INDPRTPL2 ;
!+Act:%^WGStem INDPRTPL3_Ettih ;
!+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>%{lnrs%}uh K ;
!+Act: INDPRTCONNEG_nuh ;
!+Act: INDPRTCONNEG_nnuh ;
!+Act:%^WGStem INDPRTCONNEGPL3_Ettu ;

!+Act: CONDPRS_S  ;
!+Act:%^WGStem CONDPRSPL3_Ettas ;
!+Act: CONDPRT_nus ;
!+Act:%^WGStem CONDPRTPL3_Etannus ;

!+Act: POT_N ;
!+Act:%^WGStem POTPL3_Etanneh ;

!+Act: IMPRT_kka ;
!+Act:%^WGStem IMPRTPL3_Ettahes ;

! ACT-PRSPRC_OSTAI ;
!:%^WGStem PSS-PRSPRC_Ettavu ;
! ACT-PRFPRC_nuH ;
! ACT-PRFPRC_nnuH ;
!:%^WGStem PSS-PRFPRC_Ettu ;

! M-INF        ;
! INF_A ;


LEXICON V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-WEAK
+Act: INDPRSSG1 ;
+Act: INDPRSSG2 ;
+Act: INDPRSPL1_BACK ;
+Act: INDPRSPL2_BACK ;
+Act: INDPRSCONNEG ;
+Act: INDPRTPL3_dih     ;
+Act: INDPRTCONNEGPL3_Du	   ;
+Act: CONDPRSPL3_Das ;

LEXICON V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS
+Act: INDPRTSG1     ;
+Act: INDPRTSG2     ;
+Act: INDPRTPL1_BACK     ;
+Act: INDPRTPL2_BACK     ;

LEXICON V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG
+Act: INDPRSSG3_BACK ;
+Act: INDPRTCONNEG_nnuh	   ;
+Act: CONDPRS_S_BACK ;
+Act: CONDPRT_nnus ;
+Act: CONDPRTPL3_Danus ;
+Act: POT_nnE_BACK ;
+Act: POTPL3_Daneh ;
+Act: IMPRT_Ga ;
+Act: IMPRTPL3_Dahes ;
 ACT-PRSPRC_AVUAJU ;
 ACT-PRFPRC_nnuH ;
 PSS-PRSPRC_Davu ;
 PSS-PRFPRC_DU ;
 M-INF_BACK	      ;

LEXICON V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS
+Act: INDPRTSG3     ;

LEXICON V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-WEAK
+Act: INDPRSSG1 ;
+Act: INDPRSSG2 ;
+Act: INDPRSPL1_FRONT ;
+Act: INDPRSPL2_FRONT ;
+Act: INDPRSCONNEG ;
+Act: INDPRTPL3_dih     ;
+Act: INDPRTCONNEGPL3_Dy	   ;
+Act: CONDPRSPL3_Däs ;

LEXICON V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS
+Act: INDPRTSG1     ;
+Act: INDPRTSG2     ;
+Act: INDPRTPL1_FRONT     ;
+Act: INDPRTPL2_FRONT     ;

LEXICON V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG
+Act: INDPRSSG3_FRONT ;
+Act: INDPRTCONNEG_nnyh	   ;
+Act: CONDPRS_S_FRONT ;
+Act: CONDPRT_nnys ;
+Act: CONDPRTPL3_Dänys ;
+Act: POT_nnE_FRONT ;
+Act: POTPL3_Däneh ;
+Act: IMPRT_Gä ;
+Act: IMPRTPL3_Dähes ;

 ACT-PRSPRC_KERIÄJY ;
 ACT-PRFPRC_nnyH ;
 PSS-PRSPRC_Dävy ;
 PSS-PRFPRC_DU ;

 M-INF_FRONT	      ;
