src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
taritakseh+V:tari VR_MAINITA  "tarjoutua" ;
taritakseh+V:tari VR_MAINITA  "tarjoutua" ;
vazitakseh+V:vazi VR_MAINITA  "varoa" ;
